District of Columbia statutes.
50-407

Medical.

The Bureau of Motor Vehicle Services, Office of Medical Review, may establish medical standards for all commercial and District government drivers.

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-161, § 8, 37 DCR 4665
1981 Ed., § 40-1807.